Utah, session 2026, SB272.
Section 1. Section 53E-1-201 is amended to read:53E-1-201Effective 05/06/26Partially Repealed 07/01/27. Reports to and action required of the Education Interim Committee.(1)In accordance with applicable provisions and Section 68-3-14, the following recurring reports are due to the Education Interim Committee:(a)the report described in Section 9-22-109 by the STEM Action Center Board, including the information described in Section 9-22-113 on the status of the computer science initiative and Section 9-22-114 on the Computing Partnerships Grants Program;(b)the prioritized list of data research described in Section 53H-15-303 and the report on research and activities described in Section 53H-15-305 by the Utah Data Research Center;(c)the report described in Section 53H-1-203 by the Utah Board of Higher Education on career and technical education issues and addressing workforce needs;(d)the annual report of the Utah Board of Higher Education described in Section 53H-1-203;(e)the reports described in Section 53H-7-603 by the Utah Board of Higher Education regarding activities related to campus safety;(f)the State Superintendent's Annual Report by the state board described in Section 53E-1-203;(g)the annual report described in Section 53E-2-202 by the state board on the strategic plan to improve student outcomes;(h)the report described in Section 53E-3-501 by the state board on students in an LEA who receive academic credit through the packet method;(i)the report described in Section 53E-8-204 by the state board on the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind;(j)the report described in Section 53E-10-703 by the Utah Leading through Effective, Actionable, and Dynamic Education director on research and other activities;(k)the report described in Section 53F-2-522 regarding mental health screening programs;(l)the report described in Section 53F-4-203 by the state board and the independent evaluator on an evaluation of early interactive reading software;(m)the report described in Section 53F-6-412 by the program manager of the Utah Fits All Scholarship Program;(n)the report described in Section 63N-20-107 by the Governor's Office of Economic Opportunity on UPSTART;(o)the report described in Section 53F-5-215 by the state board related to a grant for an elementary teacher preparation assessment;(p)upon request, the report described in Section 53F-5-219 by the state board on the Local Innovations Civics Education Pilot Program;(q)the report described in Section 53F-5-405 by the state board regarding an evaluation of a partnership that receives a grant to improve educational outcomes for students who are low-income;(r)the report described in Section 53H-1-604 regarding the Higher Education and Corrections Council;(s)the report described in Section 53G-7-221 by the state board regarding innovation plans; and(t)the reports described in Section 53F-6-412 regarding the Utah Fits All Scholarship Program.(2)In accordance with applicable provisions and Section 68-3-14, the following occasional reports are due to the Education Interim Committee:(a)in 2027, 2030, 2033, and 2035, the reports described in Sections 53H-1-502, 53H-1-503, and 53H-1-504;(b)in 2025, the report described in Section 53H-6-203 by a degree-granting institution regarding policies on abusive coaching practices;(c)if required, the report described in Section 53E-4-309 by the state board explaining the reasons for changing the grade level specification for the administration of specific assessments;(d)if required, the report described in Section 53E-5-210 by the state board of an adjustment to the minimum level that demonstrates proficiency for each statewide assessment;(e)the report described in Section 53E-10-702 by Utah Leading through Effective, Actionable, and Dynamic Education;(f)if required, the report described in Section 53F-2-513 by the state board evaluating the effects of salary bonuses on the recruitment and retention of effective teachers in high-poverty schools;(g)the report described in Section 53F-2-702 by the state board regarding transportation funding for charter schools;(g)(h)upon request, the report described in Section 53F-10-303 by the state board regarding the Rural School Sports Facilities Grant Program;(h)(i)upon request, a report described in Section 53G-7-222 by an LEA regarding expenditure of a percentage of state restricted funds to support an innovative education program;(i)(j)the reports described in Section 53G-11-304 by the state board regarding proposed rules and results related to educator exit surveys; and(j)(k)the report described in Section 26B-5-113 by the Office of Substance Use and Mental Health, the state board, and the Department of Health and Human Services regarding recommendations related to Medicaid reimbursement for school-based health services.(3)In accordance with applicable provisions and Section 68-3-14, every five years the Education Interim Committee shall review the programs described in the following sections of code:(a)beginning July 1, 2027, Title 53E, Chapter 10, Part 3Chapter 10, Part 3, Concurrent Enrollment;(b)beginning July 1, 2027, Section 53F-2-408, Enhancement for Accelerated Students Program;(c)beginning July 1, 2027, Section 53F-2-409, Concurrent enrollment funding;(d)beginning July 1, 2027, Section 53F-2-415, Student health and counseling support -- Qualifying personnel -- Distribution formula -- Rulemaking;(e)beginning July 1, 2028, Section 53F-2-416, Appropriation and distribution for the Teacher and Student Success Program;(f)beginning July 1, 2028, Section 53F-2-510, Digital Teaching and Learning Grant Program;(g)beginning July 1, 2028, Section 53F-9-306, Teacher and Student Success Account;(h)beginning July 1, 2028, Title 53G, Chapter 7, Part 13, Teacher and Student Success Program; and(i)beginning July 1, 2029, Section 53F-2-502, Dual language immersion.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53E-1-202 is amended to read:53E-1-202Effective 05/06/26. Reports to and action required of the Public Education Appropriations Subcommittee.(1)In accordance with applicable provisions and Section 68-3-14, the following recurring reports are due to the Public Education Appropriations Subcommittee:(a)the State Superintendent's Annual Report by the state board described in Section 53E-1-203;(b)the report described in Section 53E-10-703 by the Utah Leading through Effective, Actionable, and Dynamic Education director on research and other activities; and(c)the report by the STEM Action Center Board described in Section 9-22-109, including the information described in Section 9-22-113 on the status of the computer science initiative.(2)In accordance with applicable provisions, the Public Education Appropriations Subcommittee shall complete,  if required, the study described in Section 53F-4-304 of scholarship payments.(3)The report described in Section 53F-2-702 by the state board regarding transportation funding for charter schools is due to the Public Education Appropriations Subcommittee.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 53F-2-702 is amended to read:53F-2-702Effective 05/06/26. Funding for charter schools.(1)Except as described in Section 53F-2-302, a charter school shall receive state funds, as applicable, on the same basis as a school district receives funds.(2)(a)As described in Section 53F-2-703, the state board shall distribute charter school levy per pupil revenues to charter schools.(b)As described in Section 53F-2-704, and subject to future budget constraints, the Legislature shall provide an appropriation for charter schools for each charter school student enrolled on October 1 to supplement the allocation of charter school levy per pupil revenues described in Subsection (2)(a).(3)Charter schools are eligible to receive federal funds if they meet all applicable federal requirements and comply with relevant federal regulations.(4)The state board shall distribute funds for charter school students directly to the charter school.(5)(a)Notwithstanding Subsection (1), a charter school is not eligible to receive state transportation funding before July 1, 2028.(b)Beginning July 1, 2028, a charter school is eligible to receive state transportation funding under this section on the same basis as a school district, subject to legislative appropriation and rules the state board adopts.(b)(c)The state board shall also adopt rules relating to the transportation of students to and from charter schools, taking into account Sections 53F-2-403 and 53G-6-405.(c)(d)A charter school governing board may provide transportation through an agreement or contract with the local school board, a private provider, or parents.(6)(a)(i)In accordance with Section 53F-2-705, the State Charter School Board may allocate grants for start-up costs to charter schools from money appropriated for charter school start-up costs.(ii)The charter school governing board of a charter school that receives money from a grant under Section 53F-2-705 shall use the grant for expenses for planning and implementation of the charter school.(b)The state board shall coordinate the distribution of federal money appropriated to help fund costs for establishing and maintaining charter schools within the state.(7)(a)A charter school may receive, hold, manage and use any devise, bequest, grant, endowment, gift, or donation of any property made to the school for any of the purposes of Title 53G, Chapter 5, Charter Schools, or related provisions.(b)It is unlawful for any person affiliated with a charter school to demand or request any gift, donation, or contribution from a parent, teacher, employee, or other person affiliated with the charter school as a condition for employment or enrollment at the school or continued attendance at the school.(8)The state board shall:(a)to facilitate the eligibility transition described in Subsection (5)(b), study options for providing transportation funding or services for charter schools;(b)include in the study described in Subsection (8)(a):(i)projected costs of providing transportation funding to charter schools statewide;(ii)funding models, including:(A)per-pupil allocations;(B)route-based or mileage-based funding; and(C)regional or cooperative transportation models;(iii)potential impacts on existing school district transportation funding;(iv)equity considerations for rural, suburban, and urban charter schools; and(v)statutory or rule changes necessary to implement charter school transportation funding;(c)in conducting the study described in Subsection (8)(a), consult with:(i)charter school governing boards and administrators;(ii)school district transportation directors; and(iii)the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst; and(d)before the November 2027 interim meetings, report findings and recommendations of the report to the:(i)Education Interim Committee; and(ii)Public Education Appropriations Subcommittee.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 63I-1-253 is amended to read:63I-1-253Effective 05/06/26. Repeal dates: Titles 53 through 53G.(1)Section 53-1-122, Road Rage Awareness and Prevention Restricted Account, is repealed July 1, 2028.(2)Section 53-2a-105, Emergency Management Administration Council created -- Function -- Composition -- Expenses, is repealed July 1, 2029.(3)Section 53-2a-1103, Search and Rescue Advisory Board -- Members -- Compensation, is repealed July 1, 2030.(4)Section 53-2a-1104, General duties of the Search and Rescue Advisory Board, is repealed July 1, 2027.(5)Title 53, Chapter 2a, Part 15, Grid Resilience Committee, is repealed July 1, 2027.(6)Section 53-2d-104, State Emergency Medical Services Committee -- Membership -- Expenses, is repealed July 1, 2029.(7)Section 53-2d-503, Establishment of maximum rates, is repealed July 1, 2027.(8)Section 53-5a-302, Concealed Firearm Review Board -- Membership -- Compensation -- Terms -- Duties, is repealed July 1, 2029.(9)Section 53-11-104, Board, is repealed July 1, 2029.(10)Title 53, Chapter 31, Department Interaction With Local Law Enforcement, is repealed July 1, 2027.(11)Subsection 53C-3-203(4)(b)(vii), regarding the distribution of money from the Land Exchange Distribution Account to the Geological Survey for test wells and other hydrologic studies in the West Desert, is repealed July 1, 2030.(12)Subsection 53E-1-201(1)(q), regarding the Higher Education and Corrections Council, is repealed July 1, 2027.(13)Subsection 53E-1-201(2)(g), regarding a report to the Education Interim Committee on transportation funding for charter schools, is repealed July 1, 2028.(14)Subsection 53E-1-202(3), regarding a report to the Public Education Appropriations Subcommittee on transportation funding for charter schools, is repealed July 1, 2028.(13)(15)Subsection 53E-2-304(6), regarding foreclosing a private right of action or waiver of governmental immunity, is repealed July 1, 2027.(14)(16)Subsection 53E-3-503(5), regarding coordinating councils for youth in care, is repealed July 1, 2027.(15)(17)Subsection 53E-3-503(6), regarding coordinating councils for youth in care, is repealed July 1, 2027.(16)(18)Subsection 53E-4-202(8)(b), regarding a standards review committee, is repealed January 1, 2028.(17)(19)Section 53E-4-203, Standards review committee, is repealed January 1, 2028.(18)(20)Title 53E, Chapter 6, Part 5, Utah Professional Practices Advisory Commission, is repealed July 1, 2033.(19)(21)Subsection 53E-7-207(7), regarding a private right of action or waiver of governmental immunity, is repealed July 1, 2027.(22)Subsection 53F-2-702(5)(a), excluding a charter school from receiving state transportation funding, is repealed July 1, 2028.(23)Subsection 53F-2-702(8), regarding a report by the state board regarding transportation funding for charter schools, is repealed July 1, 2028.(20)(24)Section 53F-5-215, Elementary teacher preparation assessment grant, is repealed July 1, 2028.(21)(25)Section 53F-5-219, Local Innovations Civics Education Pilot Program, is repealed July 1, 2026.(22)(26)Title 53F, Chapter 10, Part 2, Capital Projects Evaluation Panel, is repealed July 1, 2027.(23)(27)Subsection 53G-4-608(2)(b), regarding the Utah Seismic Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2025.(24)(28)Subsection 53G-4-608(4)(b), regarding the Utah Seismic Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2025.(25)(29)Section 53G-9-212, Drinking water quality in schools, is repealed July 1, 2027.(26)(30)Subsection 53G-9-703(4), regarding the parental video presentation concerning student use of technology, is repealed January 1, 2030.(27)(31)Subsection 53H-1-402(1)(j), regarding the Higher Education and Corrections Council, is repealed July 1, 2027.(28)(32)Section 53H-1-604, Higher Education and Corrections Council, is repealed July 1, 2027.(29)(33)Subsection 53H-4-210(3), regarding the creation of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(30)(34)Subsection 53H-4-210(4), regarding the appointment of the members of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(31)(35)Subsection 53H-4-210(5), regarding the attorney general designating the chair of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(32)(36)Subsection 53H-4-210(6), regarding the quorum requirements of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(33)(37)Subsection 53H-4-210(7), regarding a formal action of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(34)(38)Subsection 53H-4-210(8), regarding compensation for members of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(35)(39)Subsection 53H-4-210(9), regarding the support staff for the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(36)(40)Section 53H-4-306.1, Definitions -- Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center, is repealed July 1, 2028.(37)(41)Section 53H-4-306.2, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Designation -- Duties, is repealed July 1, 2028.(38)(42)Section 53H-4-306.3, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Steering committee, is repealed July 1, 2028.(39)(43)Section 53H-4-306.4, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Industry advisory board, is repealed July 1, 2028.(40)(44)Section 53H-4-306.5, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Duties of the project director, is repealed July 1, 2028.(41)(45)Section 53H-4-306.6, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Project development and strategic objectives -- Reporting requirements, is repealed July 1, 2028.(42)(46)Section 53H-4-307.1, Center for Civic Excellence, is repealed July 1, 2030.(43)(47)Section 53H-4-307.2, Center for Civic Excellence -- Duties -- Authority, is repealed July 1, 2030.(44)(48)Section 53H-4-307.3, Center for Civic Excellence -- Leadership, is repealed July 1, 2030.(45)(49)Section 53H-4-307.4, Center for Civic Excellence -- Faculty, is repealed July 1, 2030.(46)(50)Section 53H-4-307.5, Center for Civic Excellence -- Curriculum, is repealed July 1, 2030.(47)(51)Section 53H-4-307.6, Center for Civic Excellence -- Oversight -- Reporting, is repealed July 1, 2030.(48)(52)Section 53H-4-313, Food Security Council, is repealed July 1, 2027.(49)(53)Section 53H-8-305, Five-year performance goals, is repealed July 1, 2027.(50)(54)Title 53H, Chapter 10, Part 4, Education Savings Incentive Program, is repealed July 1, 2028.

Section 5:
Section 5.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.